Utah statutes.
78A-6-803.   Petition for emancipation.
(1)  A minor may petition the juvenile court on his or her own behalf in the
district in which he or she resides for a declaration of emancipation.  The
petition shall be on a form provided by the clerk of the court, and state that
the minor is:
(a)  16 years of age or older;
(b)  capable of living independently of his or her parents or guardian; and
(c)  capable of managing his or her own financial affairs.
(2)  Notice of the petition shall be served on the minor's parents, guardian,
any other person or agency with custody of the minor, and the Child and Family
Support Division of the Office of the Attorney General, unless the court
determines that service is impractical.
